Illinois, session 104th, HB1127.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 7A-1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/7A-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 7A-1)7    Sec. 7A-1. Any Supreme, Appellate or Circuit Judge who has 8been elected to that office and who seeks to be retained in 9that office under subsection (d) of Section 12 of Article VI of 10the Constitution shall file a declaration of candidacy for 11retention to succeed himself in the office of the Secretary of 12State not less than 6 months before the general election 13preceding the expiration of the Judge's his term of office. 14Within 3 business days thereafter, the Secretary of State 15shall certify to the State Board of Elections the names of all 16incumbent judges who were eligible to stand for retention at 17the next general election but failed to timely file a 18declaration of candidacy to succeed themselves in office or, 19having timely filed such a declaration, withdrew it. The State 20Board of Elections may rely upon the certification from the 21Secretary of State (a) to determine when vacancies in judicial 22office exist and (b) to determine the judicial positions for 23which elections will be held. The Secretary of State, not less   HB1127- 2 -LRB104 03613 SPS 13637 b1than 63 days before the election, shall certify the Judge's 2candidacy to the proper election officials. The names of 3Judges seeking retention shall be submitted to the electors, 4separately and without party designation, on the sole question 5whether each Judge shall be retained in office for another 6term. The retention elections shall be conducted at general 7elections in the appropriate Judicial District, for Supreme 8and Appellate Judges, and in the circuit for Circuit Judges. 9The affirmative vote of three-fifths of the electors voting on 10the question shall elect the Judge to the office for a term 11commencing on the first Monday in December following the 12Judge's his election.13    Upon certification of a Judge's candidacy for retention by 14the Secretary of State, the judicial candidate may file a 15written request with the Secretary of State for redaction of 16the judicial candidate's home address information from the 17candidate's declaration of candidacy for retention. After 18receipt of the candidate's written request, the Secretary of 19State shall redact or cause redaction of the judicial 20candidate's home address from the candidate's declaration of 21candidacy for retention within 5 business days. For the 22purposes of this subsection, "home address" has the meaning as 23defined in Section 1-10 of the Judicial Privacy Act.24    A Judge that could seek retention of the Judge's office 25under this Section may not resign and seek election to the same 26office unless the former Judge has not served as elected or   HB1127- 3 -LRB104 03613 SPS 13637 b1appointed Judge for that office for at least 2 years. 2(Source: P.A. 96-886, eff. 1-1-11; 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.)